Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB551.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs shall create and prominently
display on its website a veterans' benefits and services document. The document
shall be made for the purpose of downloading to print and not exceed two (2)
standard size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches pages. The
document shall include contact information for and a description of the following
resources for veterans:
(a) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs;
(b) Substance abuse and mental health treatment;
(c) Education, workforce, and training;
(d) Tax benefits;
(e) Kentucky driver's licenses and identification cards;
(f) Eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits under state and federal
law;
(g) Legal services; and
(h) The United States Department of Veterans Affairs Veterans Crisis Line.
(2) Every employer subject to any provision of KRS 337.275 to 337.325, 337.345, or
337.385 to 337.405 or of any administrative regulations or orders issued under
KRS 337.295 shall download, print, and keep copies of the most recent version of
the veterans' benefits and services document in a conspicuous and accessible
place in or about the premises wherein any person subject thereto is employed.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/13/2025 3:46 PM Jacketed